Oklahoma, session 2025, SB411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-144.1 of Title 70, unless

there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. As used in this section, “offenses against students” means

crimes or attempts to commit crimes provided for in Section 843.5 of

Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes if the offense involved sexual

Req. No. 1369 Page 1

abus e or sexual exploitation as those terms are defined in Section

1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 741, 843.1,

if the offense included sexual abuse or sexual exploitation, 865 et

seq., 885, 888, 891, 1021, 1021.2, 1021.3, 1040.13a, 1087, 1088,

1111.1, 1114, or 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

B. If an individual employed by a public school district,

public charter school, or public virtual charter school in this

state:

1. Is being investigated for or has been arrested in relation

to offenses against students; or

2. Has been charged with offenses against students,

the law enforcement agency involved in the investigation, arrest, or

charging shall notify the superintendent of the employing school

district, public charter school, or public virtual charter school

and the members of the board of education of the employing school

district or the members of the governing board of the employing

public charter school or public virtual charter school.

C. 1. Upon receiving a notification as provided for in

subsection B of this section, the board of education of the

employing school district or the governing board of the employing

public charter school or public virtual charter school shall suspend

the school employee without notice or hearing pending the outcome of

the law enforcement investigation. The suspension shall not deprive

the employee of any compensation or other benefits to which he or

Req. No. 1369 Page 2

she is otherwise entitled. The employee shall not be allowed on

school premises during the term of suspension.

2. In a case involving a criminal charge or indictment, the

suspension may extend until the case for the employee is adjudicated

at trial. The extension shall not include any appeal process.

3. During the term of suspension, the employee shall be

prohibited from submitting his or her resignation.

D. Upon receiving a notification as provided for in subsection

B of this section, the superintendent of the employing school

district, public charter school, or public virtual charter school

shall notify the parents and legal guardians of students enrolled in

the school district, public charter school, or public virtual

charter school. The notification shall include a statement

explaining that the school employee is presumed innocent until and

unless proven guilty.

E. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to

implement the provisions of this section.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-1369 EB 1/14/2025 3:51:08 PM

Req. No. 1369 Page 3